Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.080

Research, promotional, and educational campaign.

The commission may create, provide for, and conduct a comprehensive and extensive research, promotional, and educational campaign as sales and market conditions reasonably require. It shall investigate and ascertain the needs of producers, conditions of markets, and degree of public awareness of products, and take into account this information in the discharge of its duties under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 330 s 11.]